Utah statutes.
78A-6-1101.   Violation of order of court -- Contempt -- Penalty.

(1)  Any person who willfully violates or refuses to obey any order of the court may be proceeded against for contempt of court.

(2)  Any person 18 years of age or older found in contempt of court may be punished in accordance with Section 78B-6-310.

(3) (a)  Any person younger than 18 years of age found in contempt of court may be punished by any disposition permitted under Section 78A-6-117, except for commitment to a secure facility.

(b)  The court may stay or suspend all or part of the punishment upon compliance with conditions imposed by the court.

(4)  The court may enforce orders of fines, fees, or restitution through garnishments, wage withholdings, supplementary proceedings, or executions.

